California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) Each mobile unit shall be equipped with each of the following functioning systems:

(1) A self-contained, potable water supply if shampooing services are offered.

(2) Continuous, on-demand hot water tanks which shall be not less than six-gallon capacity.

(3) A system of adequate ventilation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 648, Sec. 18.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7358.

A mobile unit shall at all times be in the charge of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter except an apprentice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 878, Sec. 48.4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7359.

It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to hire, employ, allow to be employed, or permit to work, in or about a mobile unit, any person who performs or practices any occupation regulated under this chapter who is not duly licensed by the board.

Any person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7360.

No person having charge of a mobile unit, whether as an owner or an employee, shall permit any room, or part thereof, in which any occupation regulated under this chapter is conducted or practiced, to be used for residential purposes or for any other purpose that would tend to make the unit unsanitary, unhealthy, or unsafe, or endanger the health and safety of the consuming public.

This section shall not apply when the mobile unit is used for purposes other than the practice of any occupation regulated under this chapter outside of the designated geographical boundaries for which it is licensed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1672, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1992, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1672.)
-------------------------------------------

7361.

All laws governing establishments under this chapter, except Article 6 (commencing with Section 7346), apply to mobile units, unless otherwise provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1672, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1992, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1672.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Schools, Instructors, and Curricula [7362. - 7395.2.]

7362.

(a) A school approved by the board is one that is first approved by the board and subsequently approved by the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education or is a public school in this state, and provides a course of instruction approved by the board. However, notwithstanding any other law, both the board and the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education may simultaneously process a school’s application for approval.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the board may revoke, suspend, or deny approval of a school, in a proceeding that shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, when an owner or employee of the school has engaged in any of the acts specified in paragraphs (1)
 to (8), inclusive.

(1) Unprofessional conduct which includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Incompetence or gross negligence, including repeated failure to comply with generally accepted standards for the practice of barbering, cosmetology, or electrology, or disregard for the health and safety of patrons.

(B) Repeated similar negligent acts.

(C) Conviction of any crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the owner of an approved school, in which case, the records of conviction or a certified copy thereof shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction.

(2) Repeated failure to comply with the rules governing health and safety adopted by
 the board and approved by the State Department of Public Health, for the regulation of board-approved schools.

(3) Repeated failure to comply with the rules adopted by the board for the regulation of board-approved schools.

(4) Continued practice by a person knowingly having an infectious or contagious disease.

(5) Habitual drunkenness, or habitual use of, or addiction to the use of, any controlled substance.

(6) Obtaining or attempting to obtain practice in any occupation licensed and regulated under this chapter, or money, or compensation in any form, by fraudulent misrepresentation.

(7) Refusal to permit or interference with an inspection authorized under this chapter.

(8) Any action or conduct that would have warranted the denial of a school approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 648, Sec. 19.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7362.1.

A school of cosmetology approved by the board shall also meet all of the following:

(a) Possess the equipment and floor space necessary for comprehensive instruction of 25 cosmetology students or the number of students enrolled in the course, whichever is greater.

(b) Have entered on the roll of a proposed school of cosmetology at least 25 bona fide, full-time students for the cosmetology course. For purposes of this section, a bona fide, full-time student is a person who has been entered on the roll of a proposed school of cosmetology and has committed to attend a full course in cosmetology.

(c) Maintain a course of practical training and technical instruction for the full cosmetology course as specified in this chapter and in board regulations. A course of instruction in any branch of cosmetology shall be taught in a school of cosmetology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7362.2.

A school of barbering approved by the board shall also do all of the following:

(a) Possess the equipment and floor space necessary for comprehensive instruction of 15 barber students or the number of students enrolled in the course, whichever is greater.

(b) Have entered on the roll of a proposed school of barbering at least 15 bona fide, full-time students for the barbering course. For purposes of this section, a bona fide, full-time student is a person who has been entered on the roll of a proposed school of barbering and has committed to attend a full course in barbering.

(c) Maintain a course of practical training and technical instruction for the full barbering course as specified in this chapter and in board regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7362.3.

A school of electrology approved by the board shall also do all of the following:

(a) Possess the equipment and floor space necessary for comprehensive instruction of five electrology students or the number of students enrolled in the course, whichever is greater.

(b) Have entered on the roll of a proposed school of electrology at least five bona fide, full-time students for the electrology course. For purposes of this section, a bona fide, full-time student is a person who has been entered on the roll of a proposed school of electrology and has committed to attend a full course in electrology.

(c) Maintain a course of practical training and technical instruction for the full electrology course as specified in this chapter and in board regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7362.5.

(a) A course in barbering or cosmetology established by a school shall consist of not less than 1,000 hours of practical and technical instruction in the practice of barbering or cosmetology, as defined in Section 7316.

(b) The curriculum for a barbering course shall, at a minimum, include technical and practical instruction in the following areas:

(1) One hundred hours in health and safety, which includes hazardous substances, chemical safety, safety data sheets, protection from hazardous chemicals, preventing chemical injuries, health and safety laws and regulations, and preventing communicable diseases.

(2) One hundred hours in
 disinfection and sanitation, which includes disinfection procedures to protect the health and safety of consumers as well as the technician and proper disinfection procedures for equipment used in establishments.

(3) (A) Two hundred hours in chemical hair services, which includes coloring, straightening, waving, bleaching, hair analysis, predisposition and strand tests, safety precautions, formula mixing, and the use of dye removers.

(B) Instruction in chemical hair services shall include instruction regarding the provision of services to individuals with all hair types and textures, including, but not limited to, various curl or wave patterns, hair strand thicknesses, and volumes of hair.

(4) (A) Two hundred hours in hairstyling services, which includes arranging, blow
 drying, cleansing, curling, dressing, hair analysis, shampooing, waving, and nonchemical straightening, and hair cutting, including the use of shears, razors, electrical clippers and trimmers, and thinning shears, for wet and dry cutting.

(B) Instruction in hairstyling services shall include instruction regarding the provision of services to individuals with all hair types and textures, including, but not limited to, various curl or wave patterns, hair strand thicknesses, and volumes of hair.

(5) Two hundred hours in shaving and trimming of the beard, which includes preparing the client’s hair for shaving, assessing the condition of the client’s skin, performing shaving techniques, applying aftershave antiseptic following facial services, and massaging the face and rolling cream massages.

(c) The curriculum for a
 cosmetology course shall, at a minimum, include technical and practical instruction in the following areas:

(1) One hundred hours in health and safety, which includes hazardous substances, chemical safety, safety data sheets, protection from hazardous chemicals, preventing chemical injuries, health and safety laws and regulations, and preventing communicable diseases.

(2) One hundred hours in disinfection and sanitation, which includes disinfection procedures to protect the health and safety of consumers as well as the technician and proper disinfection procedures for equipment used in establishments.

(3) (A) Two hundred hours in chemical hair services, which includes coloring, straightening, waving, bleaching, hair analysis, predisposition and strand tests, safety precautions, formula mixing,
 and the use of dye removers.

(B) Instruction in chemical hair services shall include instruction regarding the provision of services to individuals with all hair types and textures, including, but not limited to, various curl or wave patterns, hair strand thicknesses, and volumes of hair.

(4) (A) Two hundred hours in hairstyling services, which includes arranging, blow drying, cleansing, curling, dressing, hair analysis, shampooing, waving, and nonchemical straightening, and hair cutting, including the use of shears, razors, electrical clippers and trimmers, and thinning shears, for wet and dry cutting.

(B) Instruction in hairstyling services shall include instruction regarding the provision of services to individuals with all hair types and textures, including, but not limited to, various curl
 or wave patterns, hair strand thicknesses, and volumes of hair.

(5) One hundred fifty hours in skin care services, which includes chemical and manual facials and massaging, stimulating, exfoliating, cleansing, or beautifying the face, scalp, neck, or body by the use of hands, esthetic devices, cosmetic products, antiseptics, lotions, tonics, or creams that do not result in the ablation or destruction of the live tissue.

(6) Fifty hours in hair removal and lash and brow beautification, which includes tinting and perming eyelashes and brows and applying eyelashes to any person, and includes removing superfluous hair from the body of any person by use of depilatories, tweezers, sugaring, nonprescription chemicals, or waxing, or by the use of devices and appliances of any kind or description, except by the use of lasers or light waves, which are commonly known as rays.

(7) One hundred hours in manicure and pedicure, which includes water and oil manicures, hand and arm massage, foot and ankle massage, nail analysis, and artificial nail services, including, but not limited to, acrylic, liquid and powder brush-ons, dip, tips, wraps, and repairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 384, Sec. 2.   (AB 2166)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7363.

(a) A course in hairstyling established by a school shall consist of not less than 600 hours of practical and technical instruction.

(b) The curriculum for a hairstyling course shall include, at a minimum, technical and practical instruction in the following areas:

(1) One hundred hours in health and safety, which includes hazardous substances, chemical safety, safety data sheets, protection from hazardous chemicals, preventing chemical injuries, health and safety laws and regulations, and preventing communicable diseases.

(2) One hundred hours in disinfection and sanitation, which includes disinfection procedures to protect the health and
 safety of consumers as well as the technician and proper disinfection procedures for equipment used in establishments.

(3) (A) Two hundred hours in hairstyling services, which includes arranging, blow drying, cleansing, curling, dressing, hair analysis, shampooing, waving, and nonchemical straightening, and hair cutting including the use of shears, razors, electrical clippers and trimmers, and thinning shears, for wet and dry cutting.

(B) Instruction in hairstyling services shall include instruction regarding the provision of services to individuals with all hair types and textures, including, but not limited to, various curl or wave patterns, hair strand thicknesses, and volumes of hair.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 13.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7364.

(a) A course in skin care course established by a school shall consist of not less than 600 hours of practical and technical instruction.

(b) The curriculum for a skin care course shall, at a minimum, include technical and practical instruction in the following areas:

(1) One hundred hours in health and safety, which includes hazardous substances, chemical safety, safety data sheets, protection from hazardous chemicals, preventing chemical injuries, health and safety laws and regulations, and preventing communicable diseases.

(2) One hundred hours in disinfection and sanitation, which includes
 disinfection procedures to protect the health and safety of consumers as well as the technician and proper disinfection procedures for equipment used in establishments.

(3) Three hundred fifty hours in skin care, which includes chemical and manual facials and massaging, stimulating, exfoliating, cleansing, or beautifying the face, scalp, neck, or body by the use of hands, esthetic devices, cosmetic products, antiseptics, lotions, tonics, or creams that do not result in the ablation or destruction of the live tissue.

(4) Fifty hours in hair removal and lash and brow beautification, which includes tinting and perming eyelashes and brows and applying eyelashes to any person and includes removing superfluous hair from the body of any person by use of depilatories, tweezers, sugaring, nonprescription chemicals, or waxing, or by the use of devices and appliances of any kind or
 description, except by the use of lasers or light waves, which are commonly known as rays.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 648, Sec. 22.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7365.

(a) A nail care course established by a school shall consist of not less than 400 hours of practical and technical instruction.

(b) The curriculum for a nail care course shall, at a minimum, include the technical and practical instruction in the following areas:

(1) One hundred hours in health and safety, which includes hazardous substances, chemical safety, safety data sheets, protection from hazardous chemicals, preventing chemical injuries, health and safety laws and regulations, and preventing communicable diseases.

(2) One hundred hours in disinfection and sanitation, which includes
 disinfection procedures to protect the health and safety of consumers as well as the technician and proper disinfection procedures for equipment used in establishments.

(3) One hundred fifty hours in manicure and pedicure, which includes water and oil manicures, hand and arm massage, complete pedicures, foot and ankle massage, nail analysis, nail repairs, and application of artificial nails, liquid, gel, powder brush-ons, dip, nail tips, and wraps.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 648, Sec. 23.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7366.

(a) A course in electrolysis established by a school shall consist of not less than 600 hours of practical and technical instruction in
 the practice of electrology.

(b) The curriculum for an electrolysis course shall consist of technical and practical instruction in the following areas:

(1) One hundred hours in health and safety, which includes hazardous substances, chemical safety, safety data sheets, protection from hazardous chemicals, preventing chemical injuries, health and safety laws and regulations, and preventing communicable diseases.

(2) One hundred hours in disinfection and sanitation, including
 disinfection procedures to protect the health and safety of consumers and the technician and proper disinfection procedures for equipment used in establishments.

(3) Four hundred hours in electrolysis, thermolysis, blend or dual modality, and electricity.

(A) The subject of electrolysis shall include the study of epilation using single- and multiple-needle insertion techniques, the use of galvanic current, skin reactions and anaphoresis and cataphoresis, and evaluating a client’s health history for compatibility with electrolysis treatments.

(B) The subject of thermolysis shall include the study of epilation using automatic and manual thermolysis equipment, insertion techniques, the use of high frequency current in both high and low intensities, skin reactions, and evaluating a client’s health history for compatibility with thermolysis treatments.

(C) The subject of blend or dual modality shall include the study of epilation using a combination of high frequency and galvanic currents, insertion techniques, skin reactions and anaphoresis and cataphoresis, and evaluating a client’s health history for compatibility with Blend/Dual Modality treatments.

(D) The subject of electricity shall include the nature of electrical current, principles of operating electrical devices, various safety precautions to be applied when operating electrical equipment, and proper maintenance of equipment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 527, Sec. 5.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7367.

For students who change from one program of instruction to another, the board shall grant credit for training obtained in one course that is identical to training required in another course.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7368.

No school shall advertise barbering, cosmetology or electrolysis services to the public through any medium unless those services are expressly designated as student work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1672, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1992, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1672.)
-------------------------------------------

7389.

(a) The board shall develop or adopt a health and safety course on hazardous substances, basic labor laws, as specified in Section 7314.3, and physical and sexual assault awareness, as specified in Section 7314.3, which shall be taught in schools approved by the board. Course development shall include pilot testing of the course and training classes to prepare instructors to effectively use the course.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 312, Sec. 6.   (AB 326)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7389.5.

A course of training in barbering, cosmetology, or hairstyling established by federal or state correctional institutions in California may qualify a person thereby trained to take the examination for licensure as a barber, cosmetologist, or hairstylist, provided the course complies with all applicable provisions of this act and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 648, Sec. 24.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7395.1.

(a) A student who is enrolled in an approved course of instruction in a school of cosmetology approved by the board pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 7362 may, upon completion of a minimum of 25 percent of the clock hours required for graduation in the course, work as an extern in an establishment participating in the educational program of the school.

(b) A person working as an extern shall receive clock hour credit toward graduation, but that credit shall not exceed 25 hours per week and shall not exceed 25 percent of the total clock hours required for completion of the course.

(c) The externship program shall be conducted in an establishment meeting all of the following criteria:

(1) The establishment is licensed by the board.

(2) The establishment has a minimum of four licensees working at the establishment, including employees and owners or managers.

(3) All licensees at the establishment are in good standing with the board.

(4) Licensees working at the establishment work for salaries or commissions rather than on a space rental basis.

(5) No more than one extern shall work in an establishment for every four licensees working in the establishment. A regularly employed licensee shall not be displaced or have the licensee’s work hours reduced or altered to accommodate the placement of an extern in an establishment. Prior to placement of the extern, the establishment
 shall agree, in writing sent to the school and to all affected licensees, that no reduction or alteration of any licensee’s current work schedule shall occur. This shall not prevent a licensee from voluntarily reducing or altering the licensee’s work schedule.

(6) Externs shall wear conspicuous school identification at all times while working in the establishment, and shall carry a school laminated identification, that includes a picture, in a form approved by the board.

(d) (1) No less than 90 percent of the responsibilities and duties of the extern shall consist of the acts included within the practice of cosmetology as defined in Section 7316.

(2) The establishment shall consult with the assigning school regarding the extern’s progress during the externship. The owner or manager of the
 establishment shall monitor and report on the student’s progress to the school on a regular basis, with assistance from supervising licensees.

(3) A participating school shall assess the extern’s learning outcome from the externship program. The school shall maintain accurate records of the extern’s educational experience in the externship program and records that indicate how the extern’s learning outcome translates into course credit.

(e) Participation in an externship program made available by a school shall be voluntary, may be terminated by the student at any time, and shall not be a prerequisite for graduation.

(f) The establishment that chooses to utilize the extern is liable for the extern’s general liability insurance, as well as cosmetology malpractice liability insurance, and shall furnish proof to the
 participating school that the establishment is covered by both forms of liability insurance and that the extern is covered under that insurance.

(g) (1) It is the purpose of the externship program authorized by this section to provide students with skills, knowledge, and attitudes necessary to acquire employment in the field for which they are being trained, and to extend formalized classroom instruction.

(2) Instruction shall be based on skills, knowledge, attitudes, and performance levels in the area of cosmetology for which the instruction is conducted.

(3) An extern may perform only acts listed within the definition of the practice of cosmetology as provided in Section 7316, if a licensee directly supervises those acts, except that an extern may not use or apply chemical treatments unless
 the extern has received appropriate training in application of those treatments from an approved cosmetology school. An extern may work on a paying client only in an assisting capacity and only with the direct and immediate supervision of a licensee.

(4) The extern shall not perform any work in a manner that would violate the law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 648, Sec. 25.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7395.2.

(a) A student who is enrolled in an approved course of instruction in a school of barbering approved by the board pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 7362 may, upon completion of a minimum of 25 percent of the clock hours required for graduation in the course, work as an extern in an establishment participating in the educational program of the school.

(b) A person working as an extern shall receive clock hour credit toward graduation, but that credit shall not exceed
 25 hours per week and shall not exceed 25 percent of the total clock hours required for completion of the course.

(c) The externship program shall be conducted in an establishment meeting all of the following criteria:

(1) The establishment is licensed by the board.

(2) The establishment has a minimum of four licensees working at the establishment, including employees and owners or managers.

(3) All licensees at the establishment are in good standing with the board.

(4) Licensees working at the establishment work for salaries or commissions rather than on a space rental basis.

(5) No more than one extern shall work in an establishment for every four licensees working in the establishment. A regularly employed licensee shall not be displaced or have the licensee’s work hours reduced or altered to accommodate the placement of an extern in an establishment. Prior to placement of the extern, the
 establishment shall agree, in writing sent to the school and to all affected licensees, that no reduction or alteration of any licensee’s current work schedule shall occur. This shall not prevent a licensee from voluntarily reducing or altering the licensee’s work schedule.

(6) Externs shall wear conspicuous school identification at all times while working in the establishment, and shall carry a school laminated identification, that includes a picture, in a form approved by the board.

(d) (1) No less than 90 percent of the responsibilities and duties of the extern shall consist of the acts included within the practice of barbering as defined in Section
 7316.

(2) The establishment shall consult with the assigning school regarding the extern’s progress during the externship. The owner or manager of the establishment shall monitor and report on the student’s progress to the school on a regular basis, with assistance from supervising licensees.

(3) A participating school shall assess the extern’s learning outcome from the externship program. The school shall maintain accurate records of the extern’s educational experience in the externship program and records that indicate how the extern’s learning outcome translates into course credit.

(e) Participation in an externship program made available by a school shall be voluntary, may be terminated by the student at any time, and shall
 not be a prerequisite for graduation.

(f) The establishment that chooses to utilize the extern is liable for the extern’s general liability insurance, as well as barbering malpractice liability insurance, and shall furnish proof to the participating school that the establishment is covered by both forms of liability insurance and that the extern is covered under that insurance.

(g) (1) It is the purpose of the externship program authorized by this section to provide students with skills, knowledge, and attitudes necessary to acquire employment in the field for which they are being trained, and to extend formalized classroom instruction.

(2) Instruction shall be based on skills, knowledge, attitudes, and performance levels in the area of barbering for which the instruction is conducted.

(3) An extern may perform only acts listed within the definition of the practice of barbering as provided in Section 7316, if a licensee directly supervises those acts, except that an extern may not use or apply chemical treatments unless the extern has received appropriate training in application of those treatments from an approved barbering school. An extern may work on a paying client only in an assisting capacity and only with the direct and immediate supervision of a licensee.

(4) The extern shall not perform any work in a manner that would violate the law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 527, Sec. 6.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Licenses [7396. - 7402.5.]

7396.

The form and content of a license issued by the board shall be determined in accordance with Section 164.

The license shall prominently state that the holder is licensed as a barber, cosmetologist, esthetician, manicurist, electrologist, or apprentice, and shall contain a photograph of the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7396.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may, in its sole discretion, issue a probationary license to an applicant subject to terms and conditions deemed appropriate by the board, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Continuing medical, psychiatric, or psychological treatment.

(2) Ongoing participation in a specified rehabilitation program.

(3) Abstention from the use of alcohol or drugs.

(4) Compliance with all provisions of this chapter.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and for purposes of this section, when deciding whether to issue a probationary license, the board shall request that an applicant with a dismissed conviction provide proof of that dismissal and shall give special consideration to applicants whose convictions have been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4 or 1203.4a of the Penal Code.

(2) The board shall also take into account and consider any other reasonable documents or individual character references provided by the applicant that may serve as evidence of rehabilitation as deemed appropriate by the board.

(c) The board may modify or terminate the terms and conditions imposed on the probationary license upon receipt of a petition from the applicant or licensee.

(d) For purposes of issuing a probationary license to qualified new applicants, the board shall develop standard terms of probation that shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) A three-year limit on the individual probationary license.

(2) A process to obtain a standard license for applicants who were issued a probationary license.

(3) Supervision requirements.

(4) Compliance and quarterly reporting requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 675, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

7397.

Every licensee shall display the license in a conspicuous place in his or her place of business or place of employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1672, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1992, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1672.)
-------------------------------------------

7398.

A duplicate license shall be issued upon the filing of a statement explaining the loss, verified by the oath of the applicant, and accompanied by the fee required by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1672, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1992, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1672.)
-------------------------------------------

7399.

Under no circumstances shall a temporary license be issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1672, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1992, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1672.)
-------------------------------------------

7400.

Every licensee of the board, except establishments shall, within 30 days after a change of address, notify the board of the new address, and, upon receipt of the notification, the board shall make the necessary changes in the register.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7401.

(a) An individual licensed pursuant to Section 7396 shall report to the board at the time of license renewal their practice status, designated as one of the following:

(1) Full-time practice in California.

(2) Full-time practice outside of California.

(3) Part-time practice in California.

(4) Not working in the industry.

(5) Retired.

(6) Other practice status, as may be further defined by the board.

(b) An individual licensed pursuant to Section 7396 shall, at the time of license renewal, identify themselves on the application as one of the following:

(1) Employee.

(2) Independent contractor.

(3) Salon owner.

(c) An individual licensed pursuant to Section 7347 shall report to the board at the time of license renewal whether they have an independent contractor operating in the establishment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 648, Sec. 26.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7402.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, a “personal service permit” means a permit that authorizes an individual to perform services, for which he or she holds a license pursuant to this chapter, outside of an establishment, as defined in Section 7346, in accordance with the regulations established by the board.

(b) The board may issue a personal service permit to an individual who meets the criteria for a personal service permit set forth in regulation.

(c) The board shall issue regulations regarding a personal service
 permit. In establishing the regulations, the board shall hold, at a minimum, two stakeholder meetings.

(1) The board shall determine the appropriate licensing categories that may apply for a personal service permit in order to protect consumer safety.

(2) The board shall authorize a personal service permit holder to perform services outside of a licensed establishment.

(3) The board shall not exempt a personal service permit holder from any of the board’s existing regulations or requirements on health and safety.

(4) The board shall not require a personal service permit holder to be employed by an establishment, unless the board determines that
 it would be necessary in order to maintain consumer safety.

(5) The regulations may require an applicant for a personal service permit to have proof of liability insurance and to pass a criminal background clearance.

(d) A personal service permit shall be valid for two years and shall be renewed prior to expiration. The fee for a personal service permit shall be no greater than fifty dollars ($50). The fee for the renewal of a personal service permit shall be no greater than
 fifty dollars ($50). The delinquency fee shall be 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the date of the renewal.

(e) The board shall report on the progress of the regulatory process and issuance of personal service permits to the Legislature on or before July 1, 2017.

(1) The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(2) The requirement to report to the Legislature under this
 subdivision is inoperative on July 1, 2021, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 430, Sec. 28.   (AB 181)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Disciplinary Proceedings [7403. - 7405.]

7403.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may revoke, suspend, or deny at any time any license required by this chapter on any of the grounds for disciplinary action provided in this article. The proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.

(b) The board may deny a license to an applicant on any of the grounds specified in Section 480.

(c) In addition to the requirements provided in Sections 485 and 486, upon denying a license to an applicant, the board shall provide a
 statement of reasons for the denial that does the following:

(1) Evaluates evidence of rehabilitation submitted by the applicant, if any.

(2) Provides the board’s criteria relating to rehabilitation, formulated pursuant to Section 482, that takes into account the age and severity of the offense, and the evidence relating to participation in treatment or other rehabilitation programs.

(3) If the board’s decision was based on the applicant’s prior criminal conviction, justifies the board’s denial of a license and conveys the reasons why the prior criminal conviction is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a barber or cosmetologist.

(d) Commencing July 1, 2009, all of the following shall apply:

(1) If the denial of a license is due at least in part to the applicant’s state or federal criminal history record, the board shall, in addition to the information provided pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), provide to the applicant a copy of his or her criminal history record if the applicant makes a written request to the board for a copy, specifying an address to which it is to be sent.

(A) The state or federal criminal history record shall not be modified or altered from its form or content as provided by the Department of Justice.

(B) The criminal history record shall be provided in such a manner as to protect the confidentiality and privacy of the applicant’s criminal history record and the criminal history record shall not be made available by the board to any employer.

(C) The board shall retain a copy of the applicant’s written request and a copy of the response sent to the applicant, which shall include the date and the address to which the response was sent.

(2) The board shall make this information available upon request by the Department of Justice or the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 487, the board shall conduct a hearing of a license denial within 90 days of receiving an applicant’s request for a hearing. For all other hearing requests, the board shall determine when the hearing shall be conducted.

(f) In any case in which the administrative law judge recommends that the board revoke, suspend, or deny a license, the administrative law judge may, upon presentation of suitable proof,